Washington statutes.
RCW 32.16.050

Compensation of trustees.

(1) A trustee of a savings bank shall not directly or indirectly receive any pay or emolument for services as trustee, except as provided in this section.

(2) A trustee may receive, by affirmative vote of a majority of all the trustees, reasonable compensation for (a) attendance at meetings of the board of trustees; (b) service as an officer of the savings bank, provided his or her duties as officer require and receive his or her regular and faithful attendance at the savings bank; (c) service in appraising real property for the savings bank; and (d) service as a member of a committee of the board of trustees: PROVIDED, That a trustee receiving compensation for service as an officer pursuant to (b) shall not receive any additional compensation for service under (a), (c), or (d).

(3) An attorney for a savings bank, although he or she is a trustee thereof, may receive a reasonable compensation for his or her professional services, including examinations and certificates of title to real property on which mortgage loans are made by the savings bank; or if the bank requires the borrowers to pay all expenses of searches, examinations, and certificates of title, including the drawing, perfecting, and recording of papers, such attorney may collect of the borrower and retain for his or her own use the usual fees for such services, excepting any commissions as broker or on account of placing or accepting such mortgage loans.

(4) All incentive compensation, bonus, or supplemental compensation plans for officers and employees of a savings bank shall be approved by a majority of nonofficer trustees of the savings bank or approved by a committee of not less than three trustees, none of whom shall be officers of the savings bank. No such plan shall permit any officer or employee of a savings bank who has or exercises final authority with regard to any loan or investment to receive any commission on such loan or investment.

(5) If an officer or attorney of a savings bank receives, on any loan made by the bank, any commission which he or she is not authorized by this section to retain for his or her own use, he or she shall immediately pay the same over to the savings bank.

[ 1999 c 14 s 23; 1985 c 56 s 10; 1957 c 80 s 6; 1955 c 13 s 32.16.050. Prior: 1915 c 175 s 32; RRS s 3361.]